Utah statutes.
59-2-922.   Replacement resolution for greater tax rate.

Except as provided in Section 59-2-921, if, after a taxing entity approves an initial tax rate, the taxing entity determines that a greater tax rate is required, the taxing entity shall adopt a replacement resolution after the taxing entity meets the notice and public hearing requirements of Section 59-2-919 to the extent required by Section 59-2-919.



Amended by Chapter 204, 2009 General Session

